Florida, session 2026, HB4021.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 3 of section 3 of chapter 2001-336,
Laws of Florida, as amended by chapter 2019-175, Laws of
Florida, is amended to read:
Section 3. Special district.—There is hereby created and
incorporated the Melbourne-Tillman Water Control District, a
dependent special district, for the purpose of constructing,
reconstructing and repairing, maintaining, and operating a
surface water management system. The boundaries of the District
are:

All of Township 29 South, Range 36 East, and portions of
Township 29 South, Range 37 East, Township 28 South, Range
36 East and Township 28 South, Range 37 East in Brevard
County, Florida being more particularly described as
follows:

Township 29 South, Range 37 East:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4021-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4021 2026

The West 1/2 of Sections 3, 27 and 34, and all of Sections
4 through 9, 16 through 21, and 28 through 33, and the West
1/2 of the Southwest 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section
34.

Township 28 South, Range 36 East:

The South 1/2 of Sections 1 through 5, the Southeast 1/4 of
Section 6, and all of Sections 7 through 36.

All of Sections 20 and 29 located within Township 28 South,
Range 36 East shall be annexed into the City of Palm Bay.

Township 28 South, Range 37 East:

(a) The Southwest 1/4 of Section 6, the West 1/2 and
Southeast 1/4 of Section 7, the West 1/2 of Section 17, the
South 1/2 of Section 21, a portion of the Southwest 1/4 of
Section 22 described as the West 1/2 of the Northwest 1/4
of the Southwest 1/4, less Parcel 543, the South 1/2 of
Section 27, less a portion of the North 1/2 of the South
1/2 described as the area bounded by the west section line,
then southerly along the section line to a point 419 feet
distant, then easterly to a point along the east section
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4021-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4021 2026
line 450 feet southerly of the midpoint of the east section
line, then northerly along the section line to the midpoint
of the section line, then westerly to the midpoint of the
west section line, the point of beginning, the West 1/2,
Northeast 1/4 and a portion of the Southeast 1/4 described
as the North 1/2 of the Southeast 1/4 and Lot 4 and the
West 1/2 of Lot 3, all within Section 34, the West 1/2 of
the Northwest 1/4 and Northwest 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4 of
Section 35, and all of Sections 18 through 20, and 28
through 33.

(b) Tracts 1, 2, 3 & 4 of the Garner Acres Plat, a replat
of a portion of Central Highlands, as recorded in Plat Book
47, Page 13, of the Public Records of Brevard County,
Florida, lying in Section 8.

(c) Tax I.D. Parcels 503, 505, 507 & 508 lying in Section
8.

(d) Lot 29, Florida Indian River Land Company, as recorded
in Plat Book 1, Page 164, of the Public Records of Brevard
County, Florida, lying in Section 17.

(e) The Northwest 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 07;
known as Preserve at Heritage Oaks as recorded in Plat Book
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4021-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4021 2026
53, page 29, of the Public Records of Brevard County,
Florida and the Southwest 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of
Section 07; known as Eastwood One at Heritage Oaks as
recorded in Plat Book 53, page 85, of the Public Records of
Brevard County, Florida.

(f) Lot 18, Section 7, Township 28 South, Range 37 East,
Being a part of the Florida Indian River Land Company,
According to the Plat Thereof as recorded in Plat Book 1,
Page 164, Public Records of Brevard County, Florida, Less
Road and Canal Right of Way.

(g) The East 1/2 of Lot 3 of Florida Indian River Land
Company's Subdivision, lying in Section 34, Township 28
South, Range 37 East, according to the Plat Thereof as
recorded in Plat Book 1, Page 164, Public Records of
Brevard County, Florida; less the South 33 feet thereof
conveyed to the State of Florida for Road Right of Way as
recorded in Deed Book 227, Page 558, on the 28th day of May
1936, Brevard County, Florida.

The District shall constitute a dependent special district under
the laws of the state.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4021-00